Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 1 General Provisions
52-7-12.5.
Ordering drug, alcohol, or other substance tests; implied consent warning; reports; suspension; hearing; certificate of inspection.

The test or tests required under Code Section 52-7-12 shall be administered as soon as possible at the request of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe that the person has been operating or was in actual physical control of a moving vessel upon the waters of this state in violation of Code Section 52-7-12 and the officer has arrested such person for a violation of Code Section 52-7-12, any federal law in conformity with Code Section 52-7-12, or any local ordinance which is identical to Code Section 52-7-12 in accordance with Code Section 52-7-21 or the person has been involved in a boating accident resulting in serious injuries or fatalities. Subject to Code Section 52-7-12, the requesting law enforcement officer shall designate which test shall be administered initially and may subsequently require a test or tests for any substance not initially tested.

At the time a chemical test or tests are requested, the arresting officer shall select and read to the person the appropriate implied consent warning from the following:

Implied consent notice for suspects under 21 years of age:

“The State of Georgia has conditioned your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state upon your submission to state administered chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances for the purpose of determining if you are under the influence of alcohol or drugs. If you refuse this testing, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state will be suspended for a minimum period of one year. Your refusal to submit to blood or urine testing may be offered into evidence against you at trial. If you submit to testing and the results indicate an alcohol concentration of 0.02 grams or more or the presence of any illegal drug, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state may be suspended for a minimum period of one year. After first submitting to the requested state tests, you are entitled to additional chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances at your own expense and from qualified personnel of your own choosing. Will you submit to the state administered chemical tests of your

(designate which test)

?”; or

Implied consent notice for suspects 21 years of age or older:

If any such notice is used by a law enforcement officer to advise a person of his or her rights regarding the administration of chemical testing, such person shall be deemed to have been properly advised of his or her rights under this Code section and under Code Section 52-7-12.6, and the results of any chemical test, or the refusal to submit to a test of such person’s blood or urine, shall be admitted into evidence against such person. Such notice shall be read in its entirety but need not be read exactly so long as the substance of the notice remains unchanged.

“The State of Georgia has conditioned your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state upon your submission to state administered chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances for the purpose of determining if you are under the influence of alcohol or drugs. If you refuse this testing, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state will be suspended for a minimum period of one year. Your refusal to submit to blood or urine testing may be offered into evidence against you at trial. If you submit to testing and the results indicate an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more or the presence of any illegal drug, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state may be suspended for a minimum period of one year. After first submitting to the requested state tests, you are entitled to additional chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances at your own expense and from qualified personnel of your own choosing. Will you submit to the state administered chemical tests of your

(designate which test)

?”

Nothing in this Code section shall be deemed to preclude the acquisition or admission of evidence of a violation of Code Section 52-7-12 if such evidence was obtained by voluntary consent or a search warrant as authorized by the Constitution or laws of this state or the United States.

If a person under arrest or a person who was involved in any boating accident resulting in serious injuries or fatalities submits to a chemical test upon the request of a law enforcement officer and the test results indicate that a suspension of the privilege of operating a vessel on the waters of this state is required under this Code section, the results shall be reported to the department. Upon the receipt of a report of the law enforcement officer that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been operating or was in actual physical control of a moving vessel upon the waters of this state in violation of Code Section 52-7-12 or that such person had been operating or was in actual physical control of a moving vessel upon the waters of this state and was involved in a boating accident involving serious injuries or fatalities and that the person submitted to a chemical test at the request of the law enforcement officer and the test results indicate either an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more or, for a person under the age of 21 years, an alcohol concentration of 0.02 grams or more, and the vessel being operated was a motorized vessel having ten or more horsepower or was a sailboat more than 12 feet in length, the department shall suspend the person’s privilege to operate a vessel upon the waters of this state pursuant to Code Section 52-7-12.6, subject to review as provided for in this Code section.

If a person under arrest or a person who was involved in any boating accident resulting in serious injuries or fatalities refuses, upon the request of a law enforcement officer, to submit to a chemical test designated by the law enforcement officer as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, no test shall be given; but the law enforcement officer shall report the refusal to the department. Upon the receipt of a report of the law enforcement officer that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been operating or was in actual physical control of a moving vessel upon the waters of this state in violation of Code Section 52-7-12 or that such person had been operating or was in actual physical control of a moving vessel upon the waters of this state and was involved in a boating accident which resulted in serious injuries or fatalities and that the person had refused to submit to the test upon the request of the law enforcement officer, and the vessel being operated was a motorized vessel having ten or more horsepower or was a sailboat more than 12 feet in length, the department shall suspend the person’s privilege of operating a vessel on the waters of this state for a period of one year.

The law enforcement officer, acting on behalf of the department, shall personally serve the notice of intention to suspend or disqualify the privilege of operating a vessel on the waters of this state of the arrested person or other person refusing such test on such person at the time of the person’s refusal to submit to a test or at the time at which such a test indicates that suspension or disqualification is required under this Code section. The officer shall forward to the department the notice of intent to suspend and the report required by subsection (d) or (e) of this Code section within ten calendar days after the date of the arrest of such person. The failure of the officer to transmit the sworn report required by this Code section within ten calendar days shall not prevent the department from accepting such report and utilizing it in the suspension of an operator’s privilege as provided in this Code section.

If notice has not been given by the arresting officer, the department, upon receipt of the report of such officer, shall suspend the person’s privilege to operate a vessel and, by regular mail, at the last known address, notify such person of such suspension. The notice shall inform the person of the grounds of suspension, the effective date of the suspension, and the right to review. The notice shall be deemed received three days after mailing.

A person whose operator’s privilege is suspended pursuant to this Code section shall request, in writing, a hearing within ten business days from the date of personal notice or receipt of notice sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, or the right to said hearing shall be deemed waived. Within 30 days after receiving a written request for a hearing, the department shall hold a hearing as is provided in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The hearing shall be recorded. For purposes of such hearing, a copy of the report required by subsection (d) or (e) of this Code section shall be made a part of the hearing record and shall create a rebuttable presumption that the vessel being operated was a motorized vessel having ten or more horsepower or was a sailboat more than 12 feet in length.

The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the following issues:

Whether the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating or in actual physical control of a moving vessel while under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance and was lawfully placed under arrest for violating Code Section 52-7-12.

Whether the person was involved in a vessel accident or collision resulting in serious injury or fatality;

Whether at the time of the request for the test or tests the officer informed the person of the person’s implied consent rights and the consequence of submitting or refusing to submit to such test and:

Whether the person refused the test; or

Whether a test or tests were administered and the results indicated an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more or, for a person under the age of 21 years, an alcohol concentration of 0.02 grams or more; and

Whether the test or tests were properly administered by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation on an instrument approved by the Division of Forensic Sciences or a test conducted by the Division of Forensic Sciences, including whether the machine at the time of the test was operated with all its electronic and operating components prescribed by its manufacturer properly attached and in good working order, which shall be required. A copy of the operator’s permit showing that the operator has been trained on the particular type of instrument used and one of the original copies of the test results or, where the test is performed by the Division of Forensic Sciences, a copy of the crime lab report shall satisfy the requirements of this subparagraph.

The hearing officer shall, within five calendar days after such hearing, forward a decision to the department to rescind or sustain the suspension of the person’s privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state. If no hearing is requested within the ten business days specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the failure to request such hearing is due in whole or in part to the reasonably avoidable fault of the person, the right to a hearing shall have been waived. The request for a hearing shall not stay the suspension of the person’s privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state; provided, however, that if the hearing is timely requested and is not held within 60 days and the delay is not due in whole or in part to the reasonably avoidable fault of the person, the suspension shall be stayed until such time as the hearing is held and the hearing officer’s decision is made.

In the event the person is acquitted of a violation of Code Section 52-7-12 or such charge is initially disposed of other than by a conviction or plea of nolo contendere, then the suspension shall be terminated. An accepted plea of nolo contendere shall be entered on the operator’s record and shall be considered and counted as a conviction for purposes of any future violations of Code Section 52-7-12.

If the suspension is sustained after such a hearing, the person whose privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state has been suspended under this Code section shall have a right to file for a judicial review of the department’s final decision, as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; while such appeal is pending, the order of the department shall not be stayed.

Each time an approved breath-testing instrument is inspected, the inspector shall prepare a certificate which shall be signed under oath by the inspector and which shall include the following language:

“This breath-testing instrument (serial no.
_______________ ) was thoroughly inspected, tested, and standardized by the undersigned on (date
_______________ ) and all of its electronic and operating components prescribed by its manufacturer are properly attached and are in good working order.”

When properly prepared and executed, as prescribed in this subsection, the certificate shall, notwithstanding any other provision of law, be self-authenticating, shall be admissible in any court of law, and shall satisfy the pertinent requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Code Section 52-7-12 and subparagraph (g)(2)(C) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-12.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 672, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 52; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 9/SB 136; Ga. L. 2019, p. 295, § 3/HB 471; Ga. L. 2020, p. 827, § 1-5/HB 998.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 28, 2019, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “At the time a chemical test or tests are requested, the arresting officer shall select and read to the person the appropriate implied consent warning from the following:

“(1) Implied consent notice for suspects under 21 years of age:

‘Georgia law requires you to submit to state administered chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances for the purpose of determining if you are under the influence of alcohol or drugs. If you refuse this testing, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state will be suspended for a minimum period of one year. Your refusal to submit to the required testing may be offered into evidence against you at trial. If you submit to testing and the results indicate an alcohol concentration of 0.02 grams or more or the presence of any illegal drug, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state may be suspended for a minimum period of one year. After first submitting to the required state tests, you are entitled to additional chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances at your own expense and from qualified personnel of your own choosing. Will you submit to the state administered chemical tests of your (

designate which tests

) under the implied consent law?’; or

“(2) Implied consent notice for suspects 21 years of age or older:

‘Georgia law requires you to submit to state administered chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances for the purpose of determining if you are under the influence of alcohol or drugs. If you refuse this testing, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state will be suspended for a minimum period of one year. Your refusal to submit to the required testing may be offered into evidence against you at trial. If you submit to testing and the results indicate an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more or the presence of any illegal drug, your privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state may be suspended for a minimum period of one year. After first submitting to the required state tests, you are entitled to additional chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances at your own expense and from qualified personnel of your own choosing. Will you submit to the state administered chemical tests of your (

designate which tests

) under the implied consent law?’

“If any such notice is used by a law enforcement officer to advise a person of his or her rights regarding the administration of chemical testing, such person shall be deemed to have been properly advised of his or her rights under this Code section and under Code Section 52-7-12.6, and the results of any chemical test, or the refusal to submit to a test, shall be admitted into evidence against such person. Such notice shall be read in its entirety but need not be read exactly so long as the substance of the notice remains unchanged.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, substituted “requested state tests” for “required state tests” in the fifth sentence of paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 1/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Sections 8, 9, and 10 of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Jake and Griffin Prince BUI Law.”

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to waters of the state, ports, and watercraft, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 251 (1998).

52-7-12.6.
Terms of suspension; return of operating privilege; operation when suspended.

Any operator’s privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state required to be suspended under subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-12.5 shall be suspended subject to the following terms and conditions:

Upon the first suspension pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-12.5 within the previous five years, as measured from the dates of previous arrests for which a suspension was obtained to the date of the current arrest for which a suspension is obtained, the period of suspension shall be one year. Not sooner than 120 days following the effective date of suspension, the person may apply to the department for reinstatement of his or her operator’s privilege. Such privilege shall be reinstated if such person submits proof of completion of a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services and pays a restoration fee of $200.00. An operator’s privilege suspended pursuant to Code Section 52-7-12.5 shall remain suspended until such person submits proof of completion of a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services and pays a restoration fee of $200.00, unless such conviction was a recidivist conviction, in which case the restoration fee shall be $500.00;

Upon the second suspension pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-12.5 within five years, as measured from the dates of previous arrests for which suspensions were obtained to the date of the current arrest for which a suspension is obtained, the period of suspension shall be three years. Not sooner than 18 months following the effective date of suspension, the person may apply to the department for reinstatement of his or her operator’s privilege. Such privilege shall be reinstated if such person submits proof of completion of a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services and pays a restoration fee of $200.00. An operator’s privilege suspended pursuant to Code Section 52-7-12.5 shall remain suspended until such person submits proof of completion of a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services and pays a restoration fee of $200.00;

Upon the third or subsequent suspension pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-12.5 within five years, as measured from the dates of previous arrests for which suspensions were obtained to the date of the current arrest for which a suspension is obtained, the period of suspension shall be not less than five years and until such person submits proof of completion of a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services and pays a restoration fee of $200.00; and

Any person convicted of violating Code Section 52-7-12.2, 52-7-12.3, or 52-7-12.4 shall have his or her privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state suspended for three years. Such privilege shall be reinstated after the expiration of the three-year period if such person submits proof of completion of a boating education course approved by the department and pays a restoration fee of $200.00, unless such conviction was a recidivist conviction, in which case the restoration fee shall be $500.00.

In all cases in which the department may return the privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of this state to an operator prior to the termination of the full period of suspension, the department may require such tests of operating skill and knowledge as it determines to be proper, and the department’s discretion shall be guided by the operator’s past operating record and performance and the operator’s payment of a restoration fee of $200.00, unless such conviction was a recidivist conviction, in which case the restoration fee shall be $500.00.

Any person who operates a vessel or personal watercraft on any of the waters of this state at a time when such person’s privilege to do so has been suspended shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 nor more than $1,000.00; provided, however, that for a second and each subsequent conviction within a five-year period measured from the date of the previous arrest upon which a conviction was obtained to the date of the current arrest, such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000.00 nor more than $1,500.00. The period suspension of the privilege to operate a vessel on the waters of the state of any person convicted under this subsection shall be extended for an additional six months for each such conviction.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-12.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 672, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1000, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 31-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 10/SB 136; Ga. L. 2014, p. 710, § 1-22/SB 298.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, “five-year period” was substituted for “five year period” in the first sentence in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 1/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Sections 8, 9, and 10 of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Jake and Griffin Prince BUI Law.”

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to waters of the state, ports, and watercraft, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 251 (1998).

52-7-12.7.
Suspension of privileges to operate a vessel upon waters of this state for violations of vessel laws.

Except as provided for in Code Sections 52-7-12, 52-7-12.5, and 52-7-12.6, and notwithstanding criminal proceedings that may be initiated by law, upon a determination by the department that a person has violated this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, is in noncompliance with a citation issued by another state regarding the operation of a vessel, or is suspended by another state from operating a vessel, the department may suspend such person’s privilege to operate a vessel upon the waters of this state for a period of up to two years following the determination of such violation, or if the suspension is due to noncompliance with a citation or a suspension regarding the operation of a vessel in another state, then such person’s privilege to operate a vessel upon the waters of this state may remain suspended until satisfactory evidence of compliance or restoration of privileges from the other state has been received by the department as such satisfactory evidence is determined by rules and regulations of the department. Such person shall be notified of the proposed suspension personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery at such person’s last known address. The notice shall inform such person of the grounds of suspension, the effective date of the suspension, and the right to review. The notice shall be deemed received three days after mailing. The proposed suspension shall become final 30 days after issuance of notice if the proposed suspension is not appealed as provided in this Code section.

Any person whose privilege is proposed for suspension shall, upon petition within 30 days of issuance of notice given as stated in subsection (a) of this Code section, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board, and any party to the hearing, including the department, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Any person who operates a vessel on any of the waters of this state at a time when such person’s privilege to do so has been suspended under this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section 52-7-12.6.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-12.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 624, § 1/HB 777.

52-7-13.
Boating safety zones; restrictions on use of motors and operation of houseboats on certain lakes; exceptions.

The following are established as boating safety zones from May 1 through the following September 30:

The ocean waters adjacent to Jekyll Island, which shall include all those waters for a distance of 1,000 feet from the high-water mark on Jekyll Beach from the northernmost point to the southernmost point of Jekyll Island;

The ocean waters adjacent to Tybee Island Beach, which shall include all those waters for a distance of 1,000 feet from the high-water mark on Tybee Island Beach from the northernmost point to the southernmost point of Tybee Island Beach;

The ocean waters adjacent to Saint Simons Island, which shall include all those waters for a distance of 1,000 feet from the high-water mark on Saint Simons Island from the northernmost point to the southernmost point of Saint Simons Island; and

The ocean waters adjacent to Sea Island, which shall include all those waters for a distance of 1,000 feet from the high-water mark on Sea Island from the northernmost point to the southernmost point of Sea Island.

The following are established as boating safety zones at all times of the year:

The area within the marked boundary of any designated swimming area; and

The area within the marked boundary upstream or downstream of any dam designated by the commissioner.

The following are established as boating safety zones for the purpose of ensuring maritime and homeland security:

All those waters within the Elba Island liquefied natural gas mooring slip; provided, however, that liquefied natural gas tank ships and authorized vessels actively engaged in the escort, maneuvering, or support of such ships shall be permitted in such zone;

The area within 100 yards of any United States navy vessel; and

The area within 100 yards of any vessel escorted to, from, or within any port of this state by a law enforcement vessel displaying applicable law enforcement agency markings, whether such escorted vessel is in motion or anchored or moored.

Except for lifesaving, emergency, law enforcement, or dam operation and maintenance craft, it shall be unlawful to launch, float, or operate:

Any power boat within the boundaries of those boating safety zones defined in subsection (a) of this Code section; or

Any vessel within the boundaries of those boating safety zones defined in subparagraphs (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B) of this Code section, provided such zones are marked in accordance with the uniform waterway marking system.

With the exception of law enforcement crafts, no motor in excess of 9.9 horsepower shall be used on any vessel being operated on the Ogeechee River from the point where it crosses State Highway No. 119 to its point of origin.

The operation of any vessel, specifically including a houseboat, with a marine toilet, galley, or sleeping quarters shall be prohibited on Lake Burton, Bull Sluice Lake, Goat Rock Lake, Lake Harding, Lake Jackson, North Highlands Lake, Lake Oliver, Lake Rabun, Seed Lake, Tallulah Falls Lake, Tugalo Lake, Lake Oconee, and Yonah Lake.

No person shall operate or use any vessel within an area designated and appropriately marked as a “hazardous area” unless each person aboard such vessel is wearing a United States Coast Guard approved personal flotation device, which device is designated as a Type I, Type II, Type III, or Type V device. Such device must be properly fastened, in good and serviceable condition, and the proper size for the person wearing the device.

The provisions of this subsection shall not affect regulations promulgated by any agency of the federal government related to activities that may or may not be conducted within designated hazardous areas which are located within the jurisdiction of such agency.

With the exception of law enforcement or scientific research or dam operation and maintenance craft, no motor in excess of 25 horsepower shall be used on any vessel being operated on Tugalo Lake.

The operation of any of the following vessels on Lake Oconee shall be prohibited:

Any motorized vessel greater than 30 feet six inches in length; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to:

Law enforcement, scientific research, or dam operation and maintenance craft; or

A vessel not greater than 40 feet in length used for conducting group tours on behalf of the owner or operator of a REAP certified by the Department of Community Affairs under Code Section 50-8-192 if the same vessel was lawfully operated on the lake by such REAP owner or operator under former provisions of this paragraph as such existed immediately prior to May 29, 2007; in addition, such vessel may be replaced by the same REAP owner or operator but only by one vessel at a time and only if each such predecessor vessel has been retired from lawfully operating on the lake and the replacement vessel does not exceed 40 feet in length; or

Any vessel equipped with any type of bypass mechanism that reduces or eliminates the effectiveness of the muffler or baffler system required by Code Section 52-7-10.

The operation of any of the following vessels on Lake Burton, Seed Lake, Lake Rabun, Lake Tugalo, Tallulah Falls Lake, Lake Sinclair, and Lake Yonah shall be prohibited:

Any motorized vessel greater than 30 feet six inches in length; except for:

Law enforcement, scientific research, or dam operation and maintenance craft; or

Any vessel that was lawfully operated on Lake Sinclair immediately prior to May 20, 2010, and was as of such date included on the tax roll of any county within which any part of such lake lies; or

Any vessel equipped with any type of bypass mechanism that reduces or eliminates the effectiveness of the muffler or baffler system required by Code Section 52-7-10.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to vessels engaged in any activity authorized under Code Section 52-7-19.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, § 8; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1743, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, §§ 6-8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 873, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 52; Ga. L. 1984, p. 422, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, § 8; Ga. L. 1990, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 998, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 351, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 790, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, §§ 17, 18; Ga. L. 1999, p. 657, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 795, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 6/HB 1490; Ga. L. 2007, p. 622, § 1/HB 510; Ga. L. 2008, p. 943, § 1/HB 964; Ga. L. 2010, p. 118, § 2/SB 99.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “defined in subparagraphs (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B)” was substituted for “defined in paragraphs (5) and (6) of subsection (a)” in paragraph (b)(2).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, “May 29, 2007” was substituted for “the effective date of this subparagraph” in subparagraph (g)(1)(B).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “May 20, 2010,” was substituted for “the effective date of this subparagraph” in subparagraph (h)(1)(B).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, a misspelling of “liquefied” was corrected in subparagraph (a)(3)(A).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 790, § 1 amended subsection (e) of this Code section, which was redesignated as subsection (d) by Ga. L. 1993, p. 351, § 2.